sms/src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWKK-I !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõssi:ǩiõssi
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWKK-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWCC-I !!= * @CODE@ vuõlli:vuõlli
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWCC-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWXYY-I !!= * @CODE@ kuõskki:kuõskki
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWXYY-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VCC-AI !!= * @CODE@ kåččai:kåččai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VCC-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VVCC-AI !!= * @CODE@ peellai:peellai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VVCC-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VVKK-AI !!= * @CODE@ pååssai:pååssai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VVKK-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VXYY-AI !!= * @CODE@ särnnai:särnnai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VXYY-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWCC-AI !!= * @CODE@ vuejjai:vuejjai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWCC-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWKK-AI !!= * @CODE@ reäkkai:reäkkai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWKK-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWCCC-AI !!= * @CODE@ vuäggai:vuägˈgai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWCCC-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VWXYY-AI !!= * @CODE@ meälttai:meälttai
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VWXYY-AI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VXYY-I !!= * @CODE@ äjjnõʹstti:äjjnõʹstti
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VXYY-I ;
LEXICON A_SUʹVDDI !!= * @CODE@ suʹvddi:suʹvddi
+A: NMN_SUʹVDDI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_LIEQDHDHDHI !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđi:lieʹđˈđi
+A: NMN_LIEQDHDHDHI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC_VWXYY-I !!= * @CODE@ vueʹstti:vueʹstti
+A: NMN_PRSPRC_VWXYY-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_VUÕIʹNNI !!= * @CODE@ vuõiʹnni:vuõiʹnni
+A: NMN_VUÕIʹNNI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:jurdd
+A+Sg+Nom:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A: NMN_JUURD ;


!LEXICON A_SLOOHMAN
!!! !!2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 252)
!!! !!2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!!! !!2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
!!! !!2.3.2.2 LACKS Gradation
!!! !!2.3.2.2.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Gen, Pl.Acc, Pl.Ill, Pl.Loc, Pl.Com, Pl.Abe)
!!! ** Yaml: __A-sloohman__
!+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
!+A: NMN_AANAR ;

LEXICON A_RADIO 
!! check this 2015-11-10
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A: NMN_RADIO ;

LEXICON A_NALLSHEM
!! !!2. WORDS WITH MULTI-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 293)
!! !!2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
!! !!2.3.2.1 Has Gradation 
!! !!2.3.2.1.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Obl)
!!NumContLex="650"
!! ** Yaml: __A-chaalmtem__
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A: NMN_NALLSHEM ;

!! CLASS 11 ADJECTIVES
LEXICON A_ŠIÂLGGÂD !!= * @CODE@ šiâlggâd:šiâlgg
+A:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL AdjAttr-es ;
+A: NMN_VISKKÂD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_VISKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viskkâd:viskk
+A:%^PAL AdjAttr-es ;
+A: NMN_VISKKÂD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A_MÅŠŠAD !!= * @CODE@ måššad:måšš
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A: NMN_MÅŠŠAD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A_AQKHKHED !!= * @CODE@ âʹǩǩed:âʹǩǩ
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A: NMN_AQKHKHED ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A20
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A+Comp:»ab # ; 
+A+Superl:»mõs # ; 

LEXICON A_MEERSAZH
!! säʹmmlaž:säʹmml
+A+Attr:až K ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:  N_MEERSAZH ;



LEXICON A30
!+A: # ; same form
+A+Comp:»ab # ; !!NPAL
+A+Superl:»ummus # ; !!NPAL

LEXICON DenominalAdjsCShort
+Der/teʹm:»tẹ%^1VOWm A_NALLSHEM ;
!+Der/A+Pred+Sg:»teʹm # ;
!+Der/A+Pred+Pl:»teʹm # ;
!+Der/A:»teʹm AdjAttr-es ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Attr removed to avoid double tags
+Der/t+A:»t AdjDerComp ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Comp removed to avoid double tags
+Der/t+A:»t AdjDerSuperl-ummus ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Superl removed to avoid double tags


LEXICON AdjAttr-Ø
!+Attr:%^ # ;
+Attr: # ;

LEXICON AdjAttr-as
+Attr:%>as # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-âs
+Attr:%>âs # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-es
+Attr:%>es # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-os
+Attr:%>õs # ; 

LEXICON AdjDerComp
+Comp+Attr:»ab # ; 

LEXICON A_IS_ADJ-DER/COMP_ab
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
!! Class 12 Feist 163
LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_ab
+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+Comp:»ab SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ab SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+Comp:»ab PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»ba SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»be SG-LOC ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»b SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»b PL-OBL ; !!= * @CODE@ Sammallahti (1991: 188)
+Comp:»õʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»õbâ SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»õb SG-COM_IN ;
+Comp:»õb PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»õbâ ESS/PAR ;
+Comp+Ess:»ben K ;

LEXICON A_IS_ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb
+Comp+Attr:»ääb # ;
+Comp:»ääb SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ääb SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»uʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»ubu SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»ubu SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»ubu ESS/PAR ;

LEXICON A_IS_ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
!! Sammallahti 2010: 151
LEXICON ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab
+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+Comp:»ab SG-NOM ;
+Comp:»ab SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+Comp:»ab PL-NOM ;
+Comp:»õʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»uʹbbe SG-ILL ;
+Comp:»õbâ SG-LOC ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu SG-LOC ;
+Comp:»õb SG-COM_IN ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu SG-COM_IN ;
+Comp:»õb PL-OBL ;
+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu PL-OBL ;
+Comp:»õbâ ESS/PAR ;
+Use/SpellNoSugg+Use/NG+Comp:»ubâ ESS/PAR ;
+Use/SpellNoSugg+Use/NG+Comp:»ubu ESS/PAR ;

LEXICON A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_mõs
+A+Superl+Attr:»mõs # ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_SAJOS ;

LEXICON A_IS_ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus
!+Der/ummus+Superl+Attr:»ummus # ;
!+Der/ummus+Superl:»ummus NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
!+Der/umus+Superl+Attr:»umus # ;
!+Der/umus+Superl:»umus NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+Superl+Attr:»ummus # ;
+Superl:»ummus NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+Use/NG+Superl+Attr:»umus # ;
+Use/NG+Superl:»umus NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+Use/NG+Superl+Attr:»õmâs # ;
+Use/NG+Superl:»õmâs NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;


LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-mos
!+Der/mõs+Superl:»mõs # ; 
+Superl:»mõs # ; 

LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-mus
!+Der/mus+Superl:»mus # ; 
+Superl:»mus # ; 
LEXICON AdjDerSuperl-ummus
!+Der/ummus+Superl:»ummus # ; 
+Superl:»ummus # ; 

LEXICON AdjNom-as
+Attr+Sg+Gen:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Sg+Acc:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Sg+Ill:%>sa # ;
+Attr+Sg+Loc:%>sest # ;
+Attr+Sg+Com:%>sin # ;
+Attr+Ess:%>sen # ;
+Attr+Par:%>sed # ; 
+Attr+Sg+Abe:%>âztää # ;
+Attr+Pl+Nom:%>âz # ;
+Attr+Pl+Gen:%>si # ;
+Attr+Pl+Acc:%>sid # ;
+Attr+Pl+Ill:%>sid # ;
+Attr+Pl+Loc:%>sin # ;
+Attr+Pl+Com:%>sivuiʹm # ;
+Attr+Pl+Abe:%>sitää # ;


LEXICON LAZ
+A+Sg+Nom:ž # ;


LEXICON SAZ
+A+Sg+Nom:ž # ;

!! N›A derivation in +Der/N2A
LEXICON N2A_LUOQSSI
!! 1A (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+A+Attr:%>es K ;
+A:%>i SG-NOM ;
+A:%>i SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+A:%>i PL-NOM ;
+A:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
+A:%>j SG-COM_IN ;
+A:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+A:%>j PL-OBL ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON N2A_REÄBǮǮAI
!! 1B (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+A+Attr:%>as # ;
+A:%>ai SG-NOM ;
+A:%>ai SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+A:%>ai PL-NOM ;
+A:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
+A:%>j SG-COM_IN ;
+A:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+A:%>j PL-OBL ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


!!+Der/N2A: N2A_ČÄCCAI ;                !!N»A: 
LEXICON N2A_ČÄCCAI
!! 1C (Feist 2011: 198-199)
+Der/N2A+A+Attr:%>as # ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>ai SG-NOM ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>ai SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>ai PL-NOM ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j SG-COM_IN ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j PL-OBL ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+Der/N2A+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
